Utah statutes.
79-4-305.   Long-range plans.
The board shall formulate and cause to be put into execution by the department
through the director of the division a long-range, comprehensive plan and
program for the acquisition, planning, protection, operation, maintenance,
development, and wise use of areas of scenic beauty, recreational utility, or
historic, archaeological, or scientific interest, to the end that the health,
happiness, recreational opportunities, and wholesome enjoyment of life of the
people may be further encouraged within the general policies of the
department.
